Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Chapter 13. Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan.

§ 32.1-351.
Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan established.

The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall amend the Virginia Children’s Medical Security Insurance Plan to be renamed the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security (FAMIS) Plan. The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall provide coverage under the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan for individuals under the age of 19 when such individuals (i) have family incomes at or below 200 percent of the federal poverty level or were enrolled on the date of federal approval of Virginia’s FAMIS Plan in the Children’s Medical Security Insurance Plan (CMSIP); such individuals shall continue to be enrolled in FAMIS for so long as they continue to meet the eligibility requirements of CMSIP; (ii) are not eligible for medical assistance services pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act, as amended; (iii) are not covered under a group health plan or under health insurance coverage, as defined in § 2791 of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. § 300gg-91 (a) and (b)(1)); and (iv) meet both the requirements of Title XXI of the Social Security Act, as amended, and the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan. Eligible children, residing in Virginia, whose family income does not exceed 200 percent of the federal poverty level during the enrollment period shall receive 12 continuous months of coverage as permitted by Title XXI of the Social Security Act.

The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall also provide coverage for children and pregnant women who meet the criteria set forth in clauses (i) through (iv) of subsection A during the first five years of lawful residence in the United States, pursuant to § 214 of the Children’s Health Insurance Program Reauthorization Act of 2009 (P.L. 111-3).

Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan participants shall participate in cost-sharing to the extent allowed under Title XXI of the Social Security Act, as amended, and as set forth in the Virginia Plan for Title XXI of the Social Security Act. The annual aggregate cost-sharing for all eligible children in a family above 150 percent of the federal poverty level shall not exceed five percent of the family’s gross income or as allowed by federal law and regulations. The annual aggregate cost-sharing for all eligible children in a family at or below 150 percent of the federal poverty level shall not exceed 2.5 percent of the family’s gross income. The nominal copayments for all eligible children in a family shall not be less than those in effect on January 1, 2003. Cost-sharing shall not be required for well-child and preventive services including age-appropriate child immunizations.

The Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan shall provide comprehensive health care benefits to program participants, including well-child and preventive services, to the extent required to comply with federal requirements of Title XXI of the Social Security Act. These benefits shall include comprehensive medical, dental, vision, mental health, and substance abuse services, and physical therapy, occupational therapy, speech-language pathology, and skilled nursing services for special education students. The medical services required to be provided herein shall include dispensing or furnishing of up to a 12-month supply of hormonal contraceptives at one time, in accordance with subdivision A 27 of §

32.1-325

. The mental health services required herein shall include intensive in-home services, case management services, day treatment, and 24-hour emergency response. The services shall be provided in the same manner and with the same coverage and service limitations as they are provided to children under the State Plan for Medical Assistance Services.

The Virginia Plan for Title XXI of the Social Security Act shall include a provision that participants in the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan who have access to employer-sponsored health insurance coverage, as defined in §

32.1-351.1

, may, but shall not be required to, enroll in an employer’s health plan, and the Department of Medical Assistance Services or its designee shall make premium payments to such employer’s plan on behalf of eligible participants if the Department of Medical Assistance Services or its designee determines that such enrollment is cost-effective, as defined in §

32.1-351.1

.

The Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan shall ensure that coverage under this program does not substitute for private health insurance coverage.

The health care benefits provided under the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan shall be through existing Department of Medical Assistance Services’ contracts with health maintenance organizations and other providers, or through new contracts with health maintenance organizations, health insurance plans, other similarly licensed entities, or other entities as deemed appropriate by the Department of Medical Assistance Services, or through employer-sponsored health insurance. All eligible individuals, insofar as feasible, shall be enrolled in health maintenance organizations.

The Department of Medical Assistance Services may establish a centralized processing site for the administration of the program to include responding to inquiries, distributing applications and program information, and receiving and processing applications. The Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan shall include a provision allowing a child’s application to be filed by a parent, legal guardian, authorized representative or any other adult caretaker relative with whom the child lives. The Department of Medical Assistance Services may contract with third-party administrators to provide any additional administrative services. Duties of the third-party administrators may include, but shall not be limited to, enrollment, outreach, eligibility determination, data collection, premium payment and collection, financial oversight and reporting, and such other services necessary for the administration of the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan. Any centralized processing site shall determine a child’s eligibility for either Title XIX or Title XXI and shall enroll eligible children in Title XIX or Title XXI. A single application form shall be used to determine eligibility for Title XIX or Title XXI of the Social Security Act, as amended, and outreach, enrollment, re-enrollment and services delivery shall be coordinated with the FAMIS Plus program pursuant to §

32.1-325

. In the event that an application is denied, the applicant shall be notified of any services available in his locality that can be accessed by contacting the local department of social services.

The Virginia Plan for Title XXI of the Social Security Act, as amended, shall include a provision that, in addition to any centralized processing site, local social services agencies shall provide and accept applications for the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan and shall assist families in the completion of applications. Contracting health plans, providers, and others may also provide applications for the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan and may assist families in completion of the applications.

The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall develop and submit to the federal Secretary of Health and Human Services an amended Title XXI plan for the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan and may revise such plan as may be necessary. Such plan and any subsequent revisions shall comply with the requirements of federal law, this chapter, and any conditions set forth in the appropriation act. In addition, the plan shall provide for coordinated implementation of publicity, enrollment, and service delivery with existing local programs throughout the Commonwealth that provide health care services, educational services, and case management services to children. In developing and revising the plan, the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall advise and consult with the Joint Commission on Health Care.

Funding for the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan shall be provided through state and federal appropriations and shall include appropriations of any funds that may be generated through the Virginia Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan Trust Fund.

The Board of Medical Assistance Services, or the Director, as the case may be, shall adopt, promulgate, and enforce such regulations pursuant to the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) as may be necessary for the implementation and administration of the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan.

Children enrolled in the Virginia Plan for Title XXI of the Social Security Act prior to implementation of these amendments shall continue their eligibility under the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan and shall be given reasonable notice of any changes in their benefit packages. Continuing eligibility in the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan for children enrolled in the Virginia Plan for Title XXI of the Social Security Act prior to implementation of these amendments shall be determined in accordance with their regularly scheduled review dates or pursuant to changes in income status. Families may select among the options available pursuant to subsections D and F of this section.

The provisions of Chapter 9 (§

32.1-310

et seq.) of this title relating to the regulation of medical assistance shall apply, mutatis mutandis, to the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan.

In addition, in any case in which any provision set forth in Title 38.2 excludes, exempts or does not apply to the Virginia plan for medical assistance services established pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq. (Medicaid), such exclusion, exemption or carve out of application to Title XIX of the Social Security Act (Medicaid) shall be deemed to subsume and thus to include the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security (FAMIS) Plan, established pursuant to Title XXI of the Social Security Act, upon approval of FAMIS by the federal Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services as Virginia’s State Children’s Health Insurance Program.

History.

1997, c. 679; 1999, c. 1034; 2000, cc. 824, 848; 2001, cc. 238, 735, 756; 2002, c. 640; 2003, cc. 66, 71, 521; 2005, c. 584; 2006, c. 428; 2007, c. 407; 2012, cc. 646, 689; 2014, cc. 9, 183; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 245.

Cross references.

As to promulgation of standards by the Board of Health to assure that recipients of certain dental scholarships participate in the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan, see §

32.1-122.9

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, cc. 824 and 848, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective upon federal approval of the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan from the Health Care Financing Administration in the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services.” Federal approval was granted effective December 22, 2000.

Acts 2001, cc. 735 and 756, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending subsection H of §

32.1-351

shall expire on July 1, 2003.” The section is set out without the amendments by Acts 2001, cc. 735 and 756.

Acts 2014, cc. 9 and 183, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Medical Assistance Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 313 NN, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding §

32.1-325

, et seq. and §

32.1-351

, et seq. of the Code of Virginia, and effective upon the availability of subsidized private health insurance offered through a Health Benefits Exchange in Virginia as articulated through the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (PPACA), the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall eliminate, to the extent not prohibited under federal law, Medicaid Plan First and FAMIS Moms program offerings to populations eligible for and enrolled in said subsidized coverage in order to remove disincentives for subsidized private healthcare coverage through publicly-offered alternatives. To ensure, to the extent feasible, a smooth transition from public coverage, DMAS shall endeavor to phase out such coverage for existing enrollees once subsidized private insurance is available through a Health Benefits Exchange in Virginia. The department shall implement any necessary changes upon federal approval and prior to the completion of any regulatory process undertaken in order to effect such change.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 824 and 848 are virtually identical, and rewrote subsection A; added present subsections B through H; redesignated former subsections B through D as present subsections I through K and rewrote these subsections; and added subsections L through M. The amendment by c. 848 inserted “and” preceding “substance abuse services” and preceding “physical therapy.” For effective date of the 2000 amendments, see the Editor’s note.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 238 added subsection N.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 735 and 756 are identical, and added the second paragraph in subsection H; and substituted “funds that” for “funds which” in subsection J. For the expiration date of this amendment, see the Editor’s note.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 640 inserted the present second sentence in subsection G.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 66 and 71 are virtually identical, and, in subsection A, substituted “under the age of 19” for “up to the age of nineteen” and “four months” for “six months”; in subsection B, deleted “whose incomes are above 150 percent of the federal poverty level” following “participants” in the first sentence, deleted “at or” preceding “above 150” in the second sentence, rewrote the third sentence, which formerly read: “Cost-sharing for all eligible children in a family between 100 percent and 150 percent of federal poverty level shall be limited to nominal copayments and the annual aggregate cost-sharing shall not exceed 2.5 percent of the family’s gross income,” and inserted the next-to-last sentence; inserted the final two sentences in subsection C; inserted the next-to-last sentence in subsection G; and substituted “four” for “six” in the last sentence of subsection I. In addition, c. 66 substituted “centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services” for “Health Care Financing Administration” in subsection N.

The 2003 amendment by c. 521, in subsection A, substituted “19” for “nineteen” and added the last sentence.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 584 deleted the last sentence in subsection D, which formerly read: “The Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan shall provide for benefits not included in the employer-sponsored health insurance benefit plan through supplemental insurance equivalent to the comprehensive health care benefits provided in subsection C.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 428 added the last sentence of subsection F.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 407 deleted “and shall provide quarterly reports on enrollment, policies affecting enrollment, such as the exceptions that apply to the four months’ prior coverage limitation referenced in subsection A of this section, benefit levels, outreach efforts, including efforts to enroll uninsured children of former Temporary Assistance to Needy Families (TANF) recipients, and other topics” at the end of subsection I.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 646 and 689 are identical, and added subsection B; and redesignated former subsections B through N as subsections C through O.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 9 and 183 are identical, and in subsection A, deleted “(iv) have been without health insurance for at least four months or meet the exceptions as set forth in the Virginia Plan for Title XXI of the Social Security Act, as amended” following “(42 U.S.C. § 300gg-91(a) and (b) (1);” and in subsections A and B substituted “(iv)” for “(v).”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 245, effective July 1, 2021, inserted the third sentence in subsection D.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia health law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 853 (2000).

§ 32.1-351.1.
Assistance with employer-sponsored health insurance.

For purposes of this chapter, “employer-sponsored health insurance” or “ESHI” means comprehensive health insurance offered by the employer when the employer contributes to the cost of dependent or family coverage as defined in the Virginia Plan for Title XXI of the Social Security Act, or as otherwise approved by the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services in the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services.

For purposes of this chapter, ESHI shall be deemed cost-effective when the payment by the Department of Medical Assistance Services for health insurance coverage of the enrollee or enrollees under the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan shall be no greater than what would have otherwise been paid by the Department or its designee for the enrollee or enrollees.

If a family chooses to participate in ESHI and ESHI is deemed cost-effective, the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall contribute to the cost of ESHI for eligible dependent children for those program participants that have access to ESHI. Participants receiving ESHI under the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan shall apply for the full premium contribution available from the employer. Those eligible for Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan with access to ESHI may enroll in their designated ESHI at the first available opportunity and shall be covered under the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan until coverage under ESHI becomes available.

History.

2000, cc. 824, 848; 2003, c. 513; 2009, c. 578.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, cc. 824 and 848, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective upon federal approval of the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan from the Health Care Financing Administration in the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services.” Federal approval was granted effective December 22, 2000.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 513, in subsection A, substituted “to” for “at least fifty percent towards” following “contributes,” inserted “as defined in the Virginia Plan for Title XXI of the Social Security Act” following “coverage,” and substituted “Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services” for “Health Care Financing Administration.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 578 deleted subsection D, which read: “For purposes of this chapter, employers who provide health insurance coverage to employees under the Virginia health insurance demonstration project established pursuant to Chapter 11 (§

32.1-332

et seq.) of this title may meet the requirements of being employers that offer ESHI.”

§ 32.1-351.2.
Children’s Health Insurance Program Advisory Committee; purpose; membership; etc.

The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall maintain a Children’s Health Insurance Program Advisory Committee to assess the policies, operations, and outreach efforts for Family Access to Medical Insurance Security (FAMIS) and FAMIS Plus and to evaluate enrollment, utilization of services, and the health outcomes of children eligible for such programs. The Committee shall consist of no more than 20 members and shall include membership from appropriate entities, as follows: one representative of the Joint Commission on Health Care, the Department of Social Services, the Department of Health, the Department of Education, the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, the Virginia Health Care Foundation, various provider associations and children’s advocacy groups; and other individuals with significant knowledge and interest in children’s health insurance. The Committee may report on the current status of FAMIS and FAMIS Plus and make recommendations as deemed necessary to the Director of the Department of Medical Assistance Services and the Secretary of Health and Human Resources.

The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall enter into agreements with the Department of Education and the Department of Health to identify children who are eligible for free or reduced price school lunches or for services through the Women, Infants, and Children program (WIC) in order that the eligibility of such children for the Virginia Plan for Title XXI of the Social Security Act may be determined expeditiously.

History.

2000, cc. 824, 848; 2002, c. 329; 2004, c. 301; 2009, cc. 813, 840.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, cc. 824 and 848, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective upon federal approval of the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan from the Health Care Financing Administration in the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services.” Federal approval was granted effective December 22, 2000.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 329 added the third paragraph.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 301 deleted the former first paragraph and rewrote the present first paragraph.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services” near the middle of the first paragraph.

§ 32.1-352.
Virginia Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan Trust Fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Virginia Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan Trust Fund, hereinafter referred to as the “Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller and shall be administered by the Director of the Department of Medical Assistance Services. The Fund shall consist of the premium differential, any and all employer contributions which may be solicited or received by the Department of Medical Assistance Services, grants, donations, gifts, and bequests, or any and all moneys designated for the Fund, from any source, public or private. As used in this section, “premium differential” means an amount equal to the difference between (i) 0.75 percent of the direct gross subscriber fee income derived from eligible contracts and (ii) the amount of license tax revenue generated pursuant to former subdivision A 4 of §

58.1-2501

with respect to eligible contracts. As used in this section, “eligible contract” means any subscription contract for any kind of plan classified and defined in §

38.2-4201

or

38.2-4501

issued other than to (i) an individual or (ii) a primary small group employer if income from the contract is subject to license tax at the rate of 2.25 percent pursuant to former subsection D of §

38.2-4229.1

. The Department of Taxation shall annually, on or before June 30, calculate the premium differential for the immediately preceding taxable year and notify the Comptroller of the Commonwealth to transfer such amount to the Virginia Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan Trust Fund as established on the books of the Comptroller.

Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely to support the Virginia Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan in accordance with the requirements of Title XXI of the Social Security Act, as amended, the Commonwealth’s plan for the State Children’s Health Insurance Program (SCHIP), as established in Subtitle J of the federal Balanced Budget Act of 1997 (P. L. 105-33), and any conditions set forth in the appropriation act.

The Director of the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall report annually on December 1 to the Governor, the General Assembly, and the Joint Commission on Health Care on the status of the Fund, the number of children served by this program, the costs of such services, and any issues related to the Virginia Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan that may need to be addressed.

History.

1997, c. 679; 1999, c. 1034; 2000, cc. 824, 848; 2011, c. 850; 2013, cc. 136, 210.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, cc. 824 and 848, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective upon federal approval of the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan from the Health Care Financing Administration in the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services.” Federal approval was granted effective December 22, 2000.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 824 and 848 are virtually identical and substituted “Family Access to Medical Insurance Security” for “Children’s Medical Security Insurance” throughout the section; in the third sentence of subsection A, inserted “and all” preceding “employer contributions”, deleted “and all” preceding “grants”, and inserted “or any and all moneys designated for the Fund” near the end of the sentence. The amendment by c. 848 substituted “subsection D” for “subdivision D” near the end of the fifth sentence of subsection A. For the effective date of the 2000 amendments, see Editor’s note.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 850, effective for the taxable year commencing on or after January 1, 2013, substituted “Department of Taxation” for “State Corporation Commission” in the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 136 and 210, effective
January 1, 2014,
are identical and inserted “former” preceding “subdivision A 4 of §

58.1-2501

” and “former subsection D of §

38.2-4229.1

” in subsection A.

§ 32.1-353.
Rights and responsibilities.

This chapter shall not be construed as creating any legally enforceable right or entitlement to benefits under the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan under Title XXI of the Social Security Act, as amended, on the part of any person or any right or entitlement to participation. The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall enroll applicants into the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan under Title XXI to the extent funds are made available or as directed by the appropriation act. The Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan and any benefits provided thereunder shall not be assistance or public assistance pursuant to Chapter 5 (§

63.2-500

et seq.) of Title 63.2.

History.

1997, c. 679; 2000, cc. 824, 848.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, cc. 824 and 848, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective upon federal approval of the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan from the Health Care Financing Administration in the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services.” Federal approval was granted effective December 22, 2000.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 824 and 848 are virtually identical and substituted “benefits under the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security Plan under Title XXI of the Social Security Act, as amended, on the part of any person or any right or entitlement to participation” for “payment for medical services on the part of any medically indigent person or any right or entitlement to participation”
at the end of the first sentence, and added the second and third sentences. The amendment by c. 848 does not capitalize “responsibilities” in the catchline. For effective date of the 2000 amendments, see editor’s note.